Hawaii, session 2025, SB30.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 286-81, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) as follows: "(b)  Notwithstanding subsection (a) [and section 291C-195], no person shall operate a moped or motor scooter leased from a rental company on any roadway in the State unless the person wears a safety helmet, which shall be provided by the rental company unless the person provides the person's own safety helmet; provided that this subsection shall not apply to persons who possess a valid license under this chapter to operate a motorcycle or an equivalent license issued from another state.  To meet the requirements of this subsection, the safety helmet shall meet the specifications and requirements established by rules adopted by the director." SECTION 2.  Section 291C-195, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  Notwithstanding section 286-81(b), no person: (1)  Less than [fifteen] sixteen years of age shall drive a moped on a highway, street, or roadway, or any other public property in the State; and (2)  [Less than eighteen years of age shall]  Shall drive a moped unless the person wears a safety helmet securely fastened with a chin strap. The safety helmet shall meet the specifications and requirements established by rules adopted by the director." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.